Indiana, session 2026, HB1411.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-23.9-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. As used in this chapter, "land
bank" means an entity established under IC 36-7-38-2.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-24-1.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.247-2015,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.7. (a) The county executive or the county
executive's designee may:
(1) after January 1 of each calendar year in which a tax sale will
be held in the county; and
(2) not later than fifty-one (51) days after the first tax payment
due date in that calendar year;
certify to the county auditor that a property is not suitable for tax sale.
The certification must identify the names and addresses of each person
with a substantial property interest of record. When making the
application for judgment under section 4.6(b) of this chapter, the
county auditor shall include a list of the properties certified not suitable
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


for tax sale and the names and addresses of each person with a
substantial property interest of record in the certified properties that
was provided to the county auditor with the certification.
(b) Not later than ten (10) days after making the certification as
provided in subsection (a), the county executive or the county
executive's designee shall provide a notice to each person with a
substantial property interest of record in the property, stating the
following:
(1) The street address, if any, or a common description of the tract
or real property.
(2) The key number or parcel number of the tract or real property.
(3) That the property has been certified not suitable for tax sale.
(4) That the court will hear and determine the issue before the tax
sale.
(5) That if the court determines that the property is not suitable
for tax sale, the property will not be offered for sale at the tax
sale, but may be disposed of by the county executive as provided
in this chapter.
(6) That if the court determines that the property is not suitable
for tax sale, the property may be redeemed any time until one
hundred twenty (120) ninety (90) days after the conclusion of the
tax sale from which the property was removed.
(7) That if the court determines that the property is not suitable
for tax sale and the county executive disposes of the property
within three (3) years one (1) year after the conclusion of the tax
sale at which the property would have been offered for sale, any
amount received in excess of the amount of the minimum bid will
be disbursed in the same manner as if the property had been sold
in the tax sale.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-24-4.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.251-2015,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. (a) No later than fifteen (15) days before the
advertised date of the tax sale, the court shall examine the list of tracts
and real property as provided under section 4.6 of this chapter. No later
than three (3) days before the advertised date of the tax sale, the court
shall enter judgment for those taxes, special assessments, penalties, and
costs that appear to be due. This judgment is considered as a judgment
against each tract or item of real property for each kind of tax, special
assessment, penalty, or cost included in it. The affidavit provided under
section 4.6 of this chapter is prima facie evidence of delinquency for
purposes of proceedings under this section. The court shall also direct
the clerk to prepare and enter an order for the sale of those tracts and
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


real property against which judgment is entered, except as provided in
subsection (j).
(b) If written objections are timely filed, the court shall conduct a
hearing on the written objections not later than seven (7) days before
the advertised date of the tax sale. At the hearing, the court shall hear
any defense offered by any person interested in any of the tracts or
items of real property to the entry of judgment against them, hear and
determine the matter in a summary manner, without pleadings, and
enter its judgment. The court shall enter a judgment under this
subsection not later than three (3) days before the advertised date of the
tax sale. The objection must be in writing, and no person may offer any
defense unless the writing specifying the objection is accompanied by
an original or a duplicate tax receipt or other supporting
documentation. At least seven (7) days before the date set for the
hearing, notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing shall be
provided by the court to the following:
(1) Any person filing a defense to the application for judgment
and order of sale.
(2) Any person with a substantial property interest of record in a
property certified not suitable for tax sale under IC 6-1.1-24-1.7.
(c) If judgment is entered in favor of the respondent under these
proceedings or if judgment is not entered for any particular tract, part
of a tract, or items of real property because of an unresolved objection
made under subsection (b), the court shall remove those tracts, parts of
tracts, or items of real property from the list of tracts and real property
provided under section 4.6 of this chapter.
(d) A judgment and order for sale shall contain the final listing of
affected properties and the name of at least one (1) of the owners of
each tract or item of real property, and shall substantially follow this
form:
"Whereas, notice has been given of the intended application for
a judgment against these tracts and real property, and no
sufficient defense has been made or cause has been shown why
judgment should not be entered against these tracts for taxes, and
real property special assessments, penalties, and costs due and
unpaid on them, therefore it is considered by the court that
judgment is hereby entered against the below listed tracts and real
property in favor of the state of Indiana for the amount of taxes,
special assessments, penalties, and costs due severally on them;
and it is ordered by the court that the several tracts or items of real
property be sold as the law directs. Payments for taxes, special
assessments, penalties, and costs made after this judgment but
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


before the sale shall reduce the judgment accordingly.".
(e) The order of the court constitutes the list of tracts and real
property that shall be offered for sale under section 5 of this chapter.
(f) The court that enters judgment under this section shall retain
exclusive continuing supervisory jurisdiction over all matters and
claims relating to the tax sale.
(g) No error or informality in the proceedings of any of the officers
connected with the assessment, levying, or collection of the taxes that
does not affect the substantial justice of the tax itself shall invalidate or
in any manner affect the tax or the assessment, levying, or collection of
the tax.
(h) Any irregularity, informality, omission, or defective act of one
(1) or more officers connected with the assessment or levying of the
taxes may be, in the discretion of the court, corrected, supplied, and
made to conform to law by the court, or by the officer (in the presence
of the court).
(i) At the hearing required by subsection (b), the court shall hear
and determine whether properties certified by the county executive
under section 1.7 of this chapter are not suitable for tax sale. The court
shall determine a property to be not suitable for tax sale if the property:
(1) contains hazardous waste or another environmental hazard; or
(2) has unsafe building conditions;
for which the cost of abatement or remediation will exceed the fair
market value of the property.
(j) The judgment and order described in subsection (d) must also
identify any properties that the court has determined to not be suitable
for tax sale. Judgment shall be entered against these properties as
provided in this section, but an order for the sale of these properties
may not be entered. As to these properties, the judgment and order
shall state in substantially the following form:
"Whereas, this court having entered judgment against these tracts
and real property, and the court having found that these properties
are not suitable for tax sale, it is ordered that, notwithstanding the
aforementioned judgment and order, the following tracts shall not
be offered for sale under IC 6-1.1-24-5, but may be disposed of by
the county executive as provided in IC 6-1.1-24-4.7(k).".
(k) The county executive has the same rights in a property
determined by the court to be not suitable for tax sale as the county
executive has in a property that is offered for sale at a tax sale but for
which an amount greater than or equal to the minimum sale price is not
received, and may dispose of the property as provided in this chapter.
If the property is disposed of by the county executive any time within
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


three (3) years one (1) year after the conclusion of the tax sale at which
the property would have been offered for sale but for the determination
in subsection (i), the proceeds of the disposition shall be applied in
accordance with IC 6-1.1-25-9(a).
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-24-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.66-2021,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) When real property is sold under this
chapter, the purchaser at the sale shall immediately pay the amount of
the bid to the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall apply the
payment in the following manner:
(1) First, to the taxes, special assessments, penalties, and costs
described in section 5(e) of this chapter.
(2) Second, to other delinquent property taxes in the manner
provided in IC 6-1.1-23-5(b).
(3) Third, to a separate "tax sale surplus fund".
(b) A county treasurer shall pay taxes or special assessments, or
both, as follows:
(1) For any tract or item of real property located in a county
containing a consolidated city for which a tax sale certificate is
sold under this chapter, if taxes or special assessments, or both,
become due on the tract or item of real property during the period
of redemption specified under IC 6-1.1-25-4, the county treasurer
may pay the taxes or special assessments, or both, on the tract or
item of real property from the tax sale surplus held in the name of
the taxpayer, if any, after the taxes or special assessments become
due.
(2) For any tract or item of real property not located in a county
containing a consolidated city for which a tax sale certificate is
sold under this chapter, if taxes or special assessments, or both,
accrue on the tract or item of real property through and including
the year in which the owner of record is divested of title to the
real property, the county treasurer shall pay all taxes or special
assessments, or both, on the tract or item of real property from the
tax sale surplus held in the name of the taxpayer, if any, after the
tax bills are mailed. The county auditor must freeze the tax sale
surplus until all payments required under this subdivision are
paid.
(c) The:
(1) owner of record of the real property at the time the real
property was certified for sale under this chapter and before the
issuance of a tax deed; or
(2) tax sale purchaser or purchaser's assignee, upon redemption
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


of the tract or item of real property;
may file a verified claim for money which is deposited in the tax sale
surplus fund. If the claim is approved by the county auditor and the
county treasurer, the county auditor shall issue a warrant to the
claimant for the amount due.
(d) If the person who claims money deposited in the tax sale surplus
fund under subsection (c) is:
(1) a person who has a contract or agreement described under
section 7.5 of this chapter with a person described in subsection
(c)(1); or
(2) a person who acts as an executor, attorney-in-fact, or legal
guardian of a person described in subsection (c)(1);
the county auditor may issue a warrant to the person only as directed
by the court having jurisdiction over the tax sale of the parcel for which
the surplus claim is made.
(e) A court may direct the issuance of a warrant only:
(1) on petition by the claimant;
(2) within:
(A) three (3) years after the date of sale of the parcel in the tax
sale; or
(B) in the case of property that was not offered for sale in
the tax sale under section 4.7(j) of this chapter, one (1) year
after the conclusion of the tax sale at which the property
would have been offered for sale; and
(3) in the case of a petitioner to whom subsection (d)(1) applies,
if the petitioner has satisfied the requirements of section 7.5 of
this chapter.
(f) Unless the redemption period specified under IC 6-1.1-25 has
been extended under federal bankruptcy law, an amount deposited in
the tax sale surplus fund shall be transferred by the county auditor to
the county general fund and may not be disbursed under subsection (c)
if it is not claimed within the:
(1) three (3) year period after the date of its receipt; or
(2) one (1) year period after the date of its receipt if it is
attributable to property that was not offered for sale in the
tax sale under section 4.7(j) of this chapter.
(g) If an amount applied to taxes under this section is later paid out
of the county general fund to the purchaser or the purchaser's successor
due to the invalidity of the sale, all the taxes shall be reinstated and
recharged to the tax duplicate and collected in the same manner as if
the property had not been offered for sale.
(h) When a refund is made to any purchaser or purchaser's successor
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


by reason of the invalidity of a sale, the county auditor shall, at the
December settlement immediately following the refund, deduct the
amount of the refund from the gross collections in the taxing district in
which the land lies and shall pay that amount into the county general
fund.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-24-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Immediately after a tax sale purchaser pays
the bid, as evidenced by the receipt of the county treasurer, or
immediately after the county acquires a lien under section 6 of this
chapter, the county auditor shall deliver a certificate of sale to the
purchaser or to the county or to the city. The certificate shall be signed
by the auditor and registered in the auditor's office. The certificate shall
contain:
(1) a description of real property that corresponds to the
description used on the notice of sale;
(2) the name of:
(A) the owner of record at the time of the sale of real property
with a single owner; or
(B) at least one (1) of the owners of real property with multiple
owners;
(3) the mailing address of the owner of the real property sold as
indicated in the records of the county auditor;
(4) the name and mailing address of the purchaser;
(5) the date of sale;
(6) the amount for which the real property was sold;
(7) the amount of the minimum bid for which the tract or real
property was offered at the time of sale as required by section 5
of this chapter;
(8) the date when the period of redemption specified in
IC 6-1.1-25-4 will expire;
(9) the court cause number under which judgment was obtained;
and
(10) the street address, if any, or common description of the real
property.
(b) When a certificate of sale is issued under this section, the
purchaser acquires a lien against the real property for the entire amount
paid. The lien of the purchaser is superior to all liens against the real
property which exist at the time the certificate is issued.
(c) A certificate of sale is assignable. However, a purchaser who
acquires a certificate of sale may not assign the certificate of sale to a
person who was not eligible under section 5.1, 5.3, or 5.4 of this
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


chapter to bid on or purchase real property at a tax sale held under
section 5 or 6.1 of this chapter until the person satisfies the eligibility
requirements as determined by the county auditor. In addition to the
prohibition on the assignment of a tax sale certificate to a person
described in section 5.1, 5.3, or 5.4 of this chapter until the person
satisfies the eligibility requirements as determined by the county
auditor, a county legislative body may adopt an ordinance further
prohibiting the assignment of a certificate of sale acquired at a
treasurer's sale (pursuant to section 5 of this chapter) or at a county
executive's tax sale (pursuant to section 6.1 of this chapter) prior to the
issuance of a tax deed for the real property by the county auditor.
(d) An assignment not prohibited by an ordinance adopted under
subsection (c) is not valid unless the county auditor first determines the
person is eligible to receive the assignment. If the county auditor
determines the person is eligible to receive the assignment, the
following requirements apply:
(1) The assignment must be acknowledged before an officer
authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds.
(2) The assignment must be registered in the office of the county
auditor and noted in the county auditor's tax sale record under
IC 6-1.1-25-8.
When a certificate of sale is assigned, the assignee acquires the same
rights and obligations that the original purchaser acquired.
(e) Subject to IC 36-1-11-8, the county executive may assign a
certificate of sale held in the name of the county executive to any
political subdivision or to a land bank. If an assignment is made under
this subsection:
(1) the period of redemption of the real property under
IC 6-1.1-25 is one hundred twenty (120) ninety (90) days after
the date of the assignment; and
(2) notwithstanding IC 6-1.1-25-4.5(a) through
IC 6-1.1-25-4.5(c), the assignee must transmit the notices
required under IC 6-1.1-25-4.5 not later than ninety (90) sixty
(60) days after the date of the assignment.
If the real property is not redeemed during the period of redemption,
the assignee may petition the court for a tax deed under IC 6-1.1-25-4.6
not later than ninety (90) days after the expiration of the period of
redemption.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-24-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 90, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) For purposes of this section, in a county
containing a consolidated city, "county executive" refers to the board
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


of commissioners of the county as provided in IC 36-3-3-10.
(b) As used in this section, "nonprofit entity" means an organization
exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3).
(c) The county executive may by resolution:
(1) identify tax sale certificates issued under section 6 of this
chapter that the county executive desires to assign to one (1) or
more nonprofit entities; and
(2) set a date, time, and place for a public hearing to consider the
assignment of the tax sale certificates to the nonprofit entities.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), notice of the tax
sale certificates identified under subsection (c) and the date, time, and
place for the hearing on the proposed transfer of the tax sale certificates
on the list shall be published in accordance with IC 5-3-1. The notice
must include a description of the properties associated with the tax sale
certificates being considered for assignment by:
(1) parcel number;
(2) legal description; and
(3) street address or other common description.
The notice must specify that the county executive will hear any
opposition to the proposed assignments.
(e) For tax sale certificates that are not assigned when initially
identified for assignment under this section, the county executive may
omit from the notice the descriptions of the tax sale certificates and the
properties associated with the tax sale certificates identified under
subsection (c) if:
(1) the county executive includes in the notice a statement that the
descriptions of those tax sale certificates and the tracts or items of
real property associated with the tax sale certificates are available
on the website of the county government or the county
government's contractor and the information may be obtained
from the county executive in an alternative form upon request in
accordance with section 3.4 of this chapter; and
(2) the descriptions of those tax sale certificates and the tracts or
items of real property associated with the tax sale certificates are
made available on the website of the county government or the
county government's contractor and may be obtained from the
county executive in an alternative form upon request in
accordance with section 3.4 of this chapter.
(f) After the hearing set under subsection (c), the county executive
shall by resolution make a final determination concerning:
(1) the tax sale certificates that are to be assigned to a nonprofit
entity;
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


(2) the nonprofit entity to which each tax sale certificate is to be
assigned; and
(3) the terms and conditions of the assignment.
(g) If a county executive assigns a tax sale certificate to a nonprofit
entity under this section, the period of redemption of the real property
under IC 6-1.1-25 expires one hundred twenty (120) days after the date
of the assignment to the nonprofit entity. However, if the nonprofit
entity is a land bank, the period of redemption under IC 6-1.1-25
expires ninety (90) days after the date of the assignment. If a
nonprofit entity takes assignment of a tax sale certificate under this
section, the nonprofit entity acquires the same rights and obligations as
a purchaser of a tax sale certificate under section 6.1 of this chapter.
SECTION 7. IC 6-1.1-25-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2023,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) There is no right to redeem real property
under this chapter after its sale under IC 6-1.1-24 if the real property is
on the vacant and abandoned property list prepared by the county
auditor under IC 6-1.1-24-1.5. The period for redemption of any other
real property sold under IC 6-1.1-24 is:
(1) one (1) year after the date of sale; or
(2) one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of sale to a
purchasing agency qualified under IC 36-7-17 or IC 36-7-17.1; or
(3) six (6) months after the date of sale to a land bank.
(b) Subject to subsection (k) and IC 6-1.1-24-9(e), the period for
redemption of real property:
(1) on which the county executive acquires a lien under
IC 6-1.1-24-6; and
(2) for which the certificate of sale is not sold under
IC 6-1.1-24-6.1;
is one hundred twenty (120) ninety (90) days after the date the county
executive acquires the lien under IC 6-1.1-24-6.
(c) The period for redemption of real property:
(1) on which the county executive acquires a lien under
IC 6-1.1-24-6; and
(2) for which the certificate of sale is sold under IC 6-1.1-24 to a
purchaser:
(A) other than a land bank is one hundred twenty (120) days
after the date of sale of the certificate of sale under
IC 6-1.1-24; or
(B) that is a land bank is ninety (90) days after the date of
sale of the certificate of sale under IC 6-1.1-24.
(d) When a deed for real property is executed under this chapter, the
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


county auditor shall cancel the certificate of sale and file the canceled
certificate in the office of the county auditor.
(e) When a deed is issued to a county executive or other political
subdivision under this chapter, the taxes and special assessments for
which the real property was offered for sale and all subsequent taxes,
special assessments, interest, penalties, and cost of sale shall be
removed from the tax duplicate in the same manner that taxes are
removed by certificate of error.
(f) A tax deed executed under this chapter vests in the grantee an
estate in fee simple absolute, free and clear of all liens and
encumbrances created or suffered before or after the tax sale except
those liens granted priority under federal law and the lien of the state
or a political subdivision for taxes and special assessments which
accrue subsequent to the sale and which are not removed under
subsection (e). However, subject to subsection (g), the estate is subject
to:
(1) all easements, covenants, declarations, and other deed
restrictions shown by public records;
(2) laws, ordinances, and regulations concerning governmental
police powers, including zoning, building, land use,
improvements on the land, land division, and environmental
protection;
(3) liens and encumbrances created or suffered by the grantee;
and
(4) leases shown by public record if the tax deed executed under
this chapter conveys only a severed interest located in, on, under,
or above the land.
The rights that an owner of land has in, on, under, or above the land, in
a lease described in subdivision (4), or in a memorandum of a lease
described in subdivision (4) are not limited or abrogated by a tax deed
conveying an interest in one (1) or more severed interests described in
subdivision (4).
(g) A tax deed executed under this chapter for real property sold in
a tax sale:
(1) does not operate to extinguish an easement recorded before
the date of the tax sale in the office of the recorder of the county
in which the real property is located, regardless of whether the
easement was taxed under this article separately from the real
property; and
(2) conveys title subject to all easements recorded before the date
of the tax sale in the office of the recorder of the county in which
the real property is located.
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


(h) A tax deed executed under this chapter is prima facie evidence
of:
(1) the regularity of the sale of the real property described in the
deed;
(2) the regularity of all proper proceedings; and
(3) valid title in fee simple in the grantee of the deed.
(i) A county auditor is not required to execute a deed to the county
executive under this chapter if the county executive determines that the
property involved contains hazardous waste or another environmental
hazard for which the cost of abatement or alleviation will exceed the
fair market value of the property. The county executive may enter the
property to conduct environmental investigations.
(j) When a deed is issued to a purchaser of a certificate of sale sold
under IC 6-1.1-24-6.1, the county auditor shall, in the same manner that
taxes are removed by certificate of error, remove from the tax duplicate
the taxes, special assessments, interest, penalties, and costs remaining
due as the difference between:
(1) the amount of:
(A) the last minimum bid under IC 6-1.1-24-5; plus
(B) any penalty associated with a delinquency that was not due
until after the date of the sale under IC 6-1.1-24-5 but is due
before the issuance of the certificate of sale, with respect to
taxes included in the minimum bid that were not due at the
time of the sale under IC 6-1.1-24-5; and
(2) the amount paid for the certificate of sale.
(k) If a tract or item of real property did not sell at a tax sale or a
sale conducted under IC 6-1.1-24-6.1 and the county treasurer and the
owner of real property agree before the expiration of the period for
redemption under subsection (b) to a mutually satisfactory arrangement
for the payment of the entire amount required for redemption under
section 2 of this chapter before the expiration of a period for
redemption extended under this subsection:
(1) the county treasurer may extend the period for redemption;
and
(2) except as provided in subsection (l), the extended period for
redemption expires one (1) year after the date of the agreement.
(l) If the owner of real property fails to meet the terms of an
agreement entered into with the county treasurer under subsection (k),
the county treasurer may terminate the agreement after providing thirty
(30) days written notice to the owner. If the county treasurer gives
notice under this subsection, the extended period for redemption
established under subsection (k) expires thirty (30) days after the date
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


of the notice.
(m) The period of redemption for a property, which was not offered
for sale under IC 6-1.1-24-4.7(j), is one hundred twenty (120) ninety
(90) days after the conclusion of the tax sale at which the property was
not offered.
(n) A county auditor shall not issue or record a tax deed unless the
following requirements are met not later than one hundred fifty (150)
ninety (90) days after the date of the hearing at which a court grants
the tax sale buyer's petition for the tax deed:
(1) Copies of the court order to issue the tax deed and the sales
disclosure form are filed with the county auditor.
(2) The recording fees for the tax deed are paid.
(3) All subsequent or outstanding real property taxes on the
property are paid.
SECTION 8. IC 6-1.1-25-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2015,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), a
purchaser or the purchaser's assignee is entitled to a tax deed to the
property that was sold only if:
(1) the redemption period specified in section 4(a)(1) or 4(a)(3)
of this chapter has expired;
(2) the property has not been redeemed within the period of
redemption specified in section 4(a) of this chapter; and
(3) not later than six (6) months after the date of the sale:
(A) the purchaser or the purchaser's assignee; or
(B) in a county where the county auditor and county treasurer
have an agreement under section 4.7 of this chapter, the
county auditor;
gives notice of the sale to the owner of record at the time of the
sale and any person with a substantial property interest of public
record in the tract or item of real property.
For purposes of the period in which providing the notice is
required by subdivision (3), if the property was sold to a land bank
the period is not later than three (3) months after the date of the
sale.
(b) A county executive is entitled to a tax deed to property on which
the county executive acquires a lien under IC 6-1.1-24-6 and for which
the certificate of sale is not sold under IC 6-1.1-24-6.1 only if:
(1) the redemption period specified in section 4(b) of this chapter
has expired;
(2) the property has not been redeemed within the period of
redemption specified in section 4(b) of this chapter; and
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


(3) not later than ninety (90) sixty (60) days after the date the
county executive acquires the lien under IC 6-1.1-24-6, the county
auditor gives notice of the sale to:
(A) the owner of record at the time the lien was acquired; and
(B) any person with a substantial property interest of public
record in the tract or item of real property.
(c) A purchaser of a certificate of sale under IC 6-1.1-24-6.1 is
entitled to a tax deed to the property for which the certificate was sold
only if:
(1) the redemption period specified in section 4(c) of this chapter
has expired;
(2) the property has not been redeemed within the period of
redemption specified in section 4(c) of this chapter; and
(3) not later than ninety (90) sixty (60) days after the date of sale
of the certificate of sale under IC 6-1.1-24, the purchaser gives
notice of the sale to:
(A) the owner of record at the time of the sale; and
(B) any person with a substantial property interest of public
record in the tract or item of real property.
(d) The person required to give the notice under subsection (a), (b),
or (c) shall give the notice by sending a copy of the notice by certified
mail, return receipt requested, to:
(1) the owner of record at the time of the:
(A) sale of the property;
(B) acquisition of the lien on the property under IC 6-1.1-24-6;
or
(C) sale of the certificate of sale on the property under
IC 6-1.1-24;
at the last address of the owner for the property, as indicated in
the records of the county auditor; and
(2) any person with a substantial property interest of public record
at the address for the person included in the public record that
indicates the interest.
However, if the address of the person with a substantial property
interest of public record is not indicated in the public record that
created the interest and cannot be located by ordinary means by the
person required to give the notice under subsection (a), (b), or (c), the
person may give notice by publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1-4
once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks.
(e) The notice that this section requires shall contain at least the
following:
(1) A statement that a petition for a tax deed will be filed on or
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


after a specified date.
(2) The date on or after which the petitioner intends to petition for
a tax deed to be issued.
(3) A description of the tract or item of real property shown on the
certificate of sale.
(4) The date the tract or item of real property was sold at a tax
sale.
(5) The name of the:
(A) purchaser or purchaser's assignee;
(B) county executive that acquired the lien on the property
under IC 6-1.1-24-6; or
(C) person that purchased the certificate of sale on the
property under IC 6-1.1-24.
(6) A statement that any person may redeem the tract or item of
real property.
(7) The components of the amount required to redeem the tract or
item of real property.
(8) A statement that an entity identified in subdivision (5) is
entitled to reimbursement for additional taxes or special
assessments on the tract or item of real property that were paid by
the entity subsequent to the tax sale, lien acquisition, or purchase
of the certificate of sale, and before redemption, plus interest.
(9) A statement that the tract or item of real property has not been
redeemed.
(10) A statement that an entity identified in subdivision (5) is
entitled to receive a deed for the tract or item of real property if it
is not redeemed before the expiration of the period of redemption
specified in section 4 of this chapter.
(11) A statement that an entity identified in subdivision (5) is
entitled to reimbursement for costs described in section 2(e) of
this chapter.
(12) The date of expiration of the period of redemption specified
in section 4 of this chapter.
(13) A statement that if the property is not redeemed, the owner
of record at the time the tax deed is issued may have a right to the
tax sale surplus, if any.
(14) The street address, if any, or a common description of the
tract or item of real property.
(15) The key number or parcel number of the tract or item of real
property.
(f) The notice under this section must include not more than one (1)
tract or item of real property listed and sold in one (1) description.
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


However, when more than one (1) tract or item of real property is
owned by one (1) person, all of the tracts or items of real property that
are owned by that person may be included in one (1) notice.
(g) A single notice under this section may be used to notify joint
owners of record at the last address of the joint owners for the property
sold, as indicated in the records of the county auditor.
(h) The notice required by this section is considered sufficient if the
notice is mailed to the address required under subsection (d).
(i) The notice under this section and the notice under section 4.6 of
this chapter are not required for persons in possession not shown in the
public records.
(j) If the purchaser fails to:
(1) comply with subsection (c)(3); or
(2) petition for the issuance of a tax deed within the time
permitted under section 4.6(a) of this chapter;
the certificate of sale reverts to the county executive and may be
retained by the county executive or sold under IC 6-1.1-24-6.1.
SECTION 9. IC 6-1.1-25-4.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.247-2015,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.8. Not later than ninety (90) sixty (60) days after
the conclusion of a tax sale, the county auditor shall provide a notice
to each person with a substantial property interest of record in a
property that was not offered for sale in the tax sale under
IC 6-1.1-24-4.7(j). The notice must contain at least the following:
(1) The street address, if any, or a common description of the tract
or real property.
(2) The key number or parcel number of the tract or real property.
(3) A statement that the property was not offered for sale in the
tax sale.
(4) A statement that the property may be redeemed by any person
at any time until one hundred twenty (120) ninety (90) days after
the conclusion of the tax sale from which the property was
removed.
(5) The components of the amount required to redeem the
property.
(6) The date of expiration of the period of redemption specified
in section 4 of this chapter.
(7) A statement that the property may be disposed of by the
county executive as provided in IC 6-1.1-24.
(8) A statement that, if the county executive disposes of the
property within three (3) years one (1) year after the conclusion
of the tax sale at which the property would have been offered for
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129


sale, any amount received in excess of the amount of the
minimum bid will be disbursed in the same manner as if the
property had been sold in the tax sale.
2026 IN 1411—LS 7122/DI 129